Texas statutes.
ELECTION CODE

TITLE 16. MISCELLANEOUS PROVISIONS

CHAPTER 278. VOTER INFORMATION GUIDE FOR JUDICIAL ELECTIONS

Sec. 278.001. APPLICABILITY OF CHAPTER. This chapter applies to each candidate whose name is to appear on the ballot or a list of declared write-in candidates in a judicial election.

Added by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1285, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Sec. 278.002. INTERNET VOTER INFORMATION GUIDE. The secretary of state may implement a voter information service program to:

(1) compile information on candidates for election in the form of a voter information guide; and

(2) make the guide available to the public on the Internet.

Added by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1285, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Sec. 278.003. STATEMENT FILED BY CANDIDATE. If the secretary of state implements a voter information service program, a candidate may file with the secretary not later than the 70th day before the date of the judicial election an informational statement, on a form prescribed by the secretary, to be included in the voter information guide for that election.

Added by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1285, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Sec. 278.004. STATEMENT REQUIREMENTS. (a) A candidate's statement must include a summary of the following information:

(1) current occupation;

(2) educational and occupational background;

(3) biographical information; and

(4) any previous experience serving in government.

(b) The secretary of state may prescribe the format and length of the candidate's statement.

Added by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1285, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Sec. 278.005. REVIEW BY SECRETARY OF STATE. (a) Not later than the fifth day after the date the candidate's statement is received, the secretary of state may review the statement to determine whether it complies with this chapter.

(b) If the secretary of state determines that the statement does not comply with the applicable requirements, the secretary may reject the statement and deliver written notice of the reason for the rejection to the candidate not later than the second day after the date of rejection.

(c) A candidate whose statement is rejected may resubmit the statement subject to the prescribed deadline.

Added by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1285, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Sec. 278.006. PREPARATION OF GUIDE. (a) The secretary of state may contract for the preparation of the voter information guide after soliciting bids for that work. The secretary may prepare the guide if the secretary determines that the costs of that preparation are less than or equal to the most reasonable bid submitted.

(b) The voter information guide must include the candidates' statements that comply with this chapter, with candidates for election and write-in candidates for election as separate groups. The order of the candidates' names within the groups is determined by a drawing conducted by the secretary of state.

(c) The secretary of state may prescribe appropriate explanatory material to be included in the voter information guide to assist the voters, including a statement that the guide may be used at the polls to assist the voters in marking their ballots.

Added by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1285, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Sec. 278.007. AVAILABILITY OF GUIDE. If the secretary of state implements a voter information service program, the secretary may make the voter information guide available to the public on the Internet not later than the 45th day before the date of each judicial election.

Added by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1285, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Sec. 278.008. ADDITIONAL PROCEDURES. The secretary of state may prescribe any additional procedures necessary to implement this chapter.

Added by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1285, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 2001.